Georgia, session 2025_26, HB754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reconstitute the Board of Education of Catoosa County, Georgia, approved
March 30, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993, p. 4258), as amended, is amended by adding a new section to
read as follows:
"SECTION 7.1.
(a) There shall be an internal audit function of the board that falls under the supervision
of an internal auditor. The internal auditor may be either an individual employed by the
board or the account manager of a firm hired as provided for in this section. The internal
H. B. 754
- 1 -

LC 47 3576/AP
auditor shall be appointed by the board from a list of nominations provided by the members
of the General Assembly that represent all or a part of the school district. All costs
associated with the internal auditor shall be paid from the local funds of the board.
(b) The internal auditor shall be a certified internal auditor or a certified public accountant,
demonstrating at least five years' experience.
(c) The internal auditor need not be a resident of the school district at the time of his or her
appointment or during the period of service as the internal auditor.
(d) The internal auditor shall not be involved in partisan political activities or the political
affairs of the school system.
(e) Within the budget approval process and established personnel policies for all
departments, the internal auditor shall, with board approval, have the power to appoint,
employ, and remove such assistants, employees, and personnel as he or she may deem
necessary for the efficient and effective administration of the office.
(f) The internal auditor shall be charged with, but not be limited to, the following duties
and responsibilities:
(1) To conduct one- and five-year performance and financial audits of the school system
and its departments, offices, and activities in order to independently determine whether:
(A) Implemented activities and programs have been authorized by the board, the
superintendent, state law, or applicable federal law or regulations and that the activities
and programs are being conducted and funds expended in compliance with applicable
laws;
(B) The department, office, or agency is acquiring, managing, protecting, and utilizing
its personnel, property, equipment, space, and other resources, including public funds,
economically, efficiently, and effectively and in a manner consistent with the objectives
of the authorizing entity or enabling legislation;
(C) The organizations, programs, activities, functions, or policies are effective,
including the identification of any causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices,
H. B. 754
- 2 -

LC 47 3576/AP
such as inadequacies in management information systems, internal and administrative
procedures, organization structure, use of resources, allocation of personnel, purchasing
policies, and equipment;
(D) The desired results or benefits are being achieved;
(E) Financial and other reports are being provided that fairly, accurately, and fully
disclose all information that is required by law, necessary to ascertain the nature and
scope of programs and activities, and necessary to establish a proper basis for
evaluating the results of programs and activities, including the collection of, accounting
for, and depositing of revenues and other resources;
(F) Management has established adequate operating and administrative procedures and
practices, systems, or internal control accounting systems and internal management
controls; and
(G) Indications of fraud or abuse or illegal acts are present;
(2) To submit an annual report to the board and each member of the General Assembly
representing all or a part of the school district, indicating audits completed, major
findings, corrective actions taken by administrative managers, and significant findings
which have not been fully addressed by management; and
(3) To perform such other duties and responsibilities as provided for by this Act or
directed by the board.
(g) All officers and employees shall allow the internal auditor immediate access to any and
all books, records, documents, and other requested information, including automated data,
pertaining to the business of the school system and within their custody regarding powers,
duties, activities, organization, property, financial transactions, contracts, and methods of
business required to conduct an audit or other official duties. In addition, such officers and
employees shall provide access for the auditor to inspect all property, equipment, and
facilities within their custody. Further, all contracts with outside contractors and
subcontractors shall provide for the auditor's access to all financial and performance related
H. B. 754
- 3 -

LC 47 3576/AP
records, property, and equipment purchased in whole or in part with system funds and
facilities.
(h)(1) The internal auditor shall present any confidential information to the board during
regularly scheduled closed executive sessions.
(2) The internal auditor shall have the opportunity to address the board at any meeting
of the board following the superintendent giving any reports to the board at such meeting.
(i) The internal auditor shall not publicly disclose any information received during an audit
that is confidential in accordance with any local, state, or federal law or regulation.
(j) Any reports issued by the internal auditor shall be made available for public inspection
or copying at a reasonable cost.
(k) The provisions of this subsection shall stand repealed on July 1, 2030."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 754
- 4 -